Washington statutes.
RCW 43.384.040

Statewide tourism marketing account—Matching funds.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2061-S.SL) ***

The statewide tourism marketing account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from tax revenues under RCW 82.08.225 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenditures of the department that are related to implementation of a statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the authority. A one-to-one nonstate or state fund, other than general fund state, match must be provided for all expenditures from the account. A match may consist of nonstate or state fund, other than general fund state, cash contributions deposited in the private local account created under RCW 43.384.020(4), the value of an advertising equivalency contribution, or an in-kind contribution. The board must determine criteria for what qualifies as an in-kind contribution.

[ 2023 c 348 s 1; 2018 c 275 s 5.]